src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
* LEXICON Harm-Neutr_ACT-PRSPRC_v_LUGWMA  lugõma:lugõ
Retain consonant and stem vowel

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+PrfPrc:%>n%{uü%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
